North Carolina, session 2025, HB82.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is created the Study Commission on Large Local School
Administrative Units (Commission). The purpose of the Commission is to study whether the
local school administrative units with the five largest student populations in the State experience
any negative outcomes due to the large student populations and to suggest remedies to any
negative outcomes caused by the size of the student populations.
SECTION 1.(b) The Commission shall consist of nine voting members as follows:
(1) A chair, jointly appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate from among the membership of the
General Assembly. Resignation of the member from membership in the
General Assembly shall be deemed a resignation from the Commission.
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives. Resignation of the member from the House of
Representatives shall be deemed a resignation from the Commission.
(3) Two members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate. Resignation of the member from the Senate shall be deemed a
resignation from the Commission.
(4) One member from a local board of education of one of the five local school
administrative units with the largest student populations to be appointed by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The member shall be from a
different local board of education than the member appointed pursuant to
subdivision (5) of this subsection. Resignation of the member from the local
board of education shall be deemed a resignation from the Commission.
(5) One member from a local board of education of one of the five local school
administrative units with the largest student populations to be appointed by
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The member shall be from a different
local board of education than the member appointed pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this subsection. Resignation of the member from the local board of
education shall be deemed a resignation from the Commission.
(6) Two members shall be recommended by the Department of Public Instruction
and shall be jointly appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives
and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
*H82-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) The Commission shall meet upon the call of the chair. Any vacancy
on the Commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority within 30 days of the
vacancy occurring. If a recommendation is required for the initial appointment of a member, the
recommending authority shall provide a recommendation to fill the vacancy. A quorum of the
Commission shall be a majority of its members.
SECTION 1.(d) The Commission shall study any negative outcomes in the five
largest local school administrative units in the State, determine if any of those outcomes are
caused by the large population of the unit, and develop recommendations on methods of
addressing the outcomes.
SECTION 1.(e) Members of the Commission shall receive per diem, subsistence,
and travel allowances in accordance with G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The
Commission, while in the discharge of its official duties, may exercise all powers provided for
under G.S. 120-19 and G.S. 120-19.1 through G.S. 120-19.4. The Commission may meet in the
Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building.
With approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Legislative Services
Officer shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House of
Representatives' and the Senate's Directors of Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical staff to
the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the
Commission. The Commission may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services as
provided by G.S. 120-32.02. If the Commission hires a consultant, the consultant shall not be a
State employee or a person currently under contract with the State to provide services.
All State departments and agencies and local governments and their subdivisions shall
furnish the Commission with any information in their possession or available to them.
SECTION 1.(f) The Commission shall report the results of its study and its
recommendations, including any proposed legislative changes, to the 2026 Regular Session of
the 2025 General Assembly. The Commission shall terminate on December 31, 2026, or upon
the filing of its final report, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 1.(g) Of the funds appropriated to the General Assembly, the Legislative
Services Commission shall allocate funds for the expenses of the Study Commission on Large
Local School Administrative Units.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 82-First Edition